Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2248.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Title 36, chapter 6, article 4.2, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 36-683, to read: START_STATUTE36-683. Medical interventions; prohibition; applicability; enforcement; definitions A. A business entity doing business in this state may not: 1. Refuse to provide any service, product, admission to a venue or transportation to a person because that person has or has not received or used a medical intervention. 2. Require any medical intervention as a term of employment unless the terms of employment include travel to a foreign jurisdiction requiring a medical intervention as the only means of entry or require entry into a place of business or facility in a foreign jurisdiction and that place of business or facility requires a medical intervention as the only means of entry. If an employee is required to receive or use a medical intervention due to travel to a foreign jurisdiction or entry into a place of business or facility in a foreign jurisdiction, the medical intervention requirement shall be included in either a valid written employment contract between the employer and the employee or, if a written employment contract does not exist, an advance written notice that is provided to the impacted employee at least fourteen days before the employee is required to receive or use the medical intervention. This paragraph does not apply to business entities that receive medicare or medicaid funding. B. A ticket issuer may not penalize, discriminate against or deny access to an entertainment event by a ticket holder because the ticket holder has or has not received or used a medical intervention. C. A school operating in this state may not require a medical intervention for any person to attend the school, enter a campus or building or be employed, subject to the parents' bill of rights prescribed in section 1-602, unless either: 1. The person is a student who is prohibited from attending school pursuant to section 15-873. 2. The person has any of the following infections or infestations and the risk of spreading the infection or infestation is not yet sufficiently mitigated according to rules adopted by the department: (a) Acute conjunctivitis. (b) A pediculosis infestation. (c) A scabies infestation. (d) A streptococcal group A infection with streptococcal lesions or streptococcal sore throat. d. a business entity operating in this state may not require a medical intervention for any person to attend, enter the business entity's building or premises or be employed. e. A state, county or local government entity or official in this state may not require any person: 1. To receive or use a medical intervention. 2. to receive or use a medical intervention as A condition of any of the following: (a) receiving any government benefit. (b) receiving any government service. (c) receiving any government-issued license or permit. (d) entering any building. (e) using transportation. 3. to receive or use a medical intervention as A term of employment. f. A business entity or a state, county or local government in this state may not provide or offer any different salary, hourly wage or other ongoing compensation or benefit to an employee based on whether the employee has or has not received or used a medical intervention. g. The medical intervention prohibitions prescribed in this section do not apply to any situation in which personal protective equipment, items or clothing are required by employers in the public or private sector based on existing traditional and accepted industry standards or federal law. This subsection does not apply to or include any vaccine, mask requirement or other medical intervention that was introduced during the COVID-19 pandemic. h. This section may be enforced and injunctive relief may be pursued by either the attorney general or the prosecuting attorney for the county where a violation occurs. If a business entity or state, county or local government entity in this state is found to have violated any provision of this section, the attorney general or prosecuting attorney, as applicable, shall be awarded attorney fees and costs incurred in pursuing the enforcement action. i. for the purposes of this section: 1. "Business entity": (a) Means any person or group of persons that performs or engages in any activity, enterprise, profession or occupation for gain, benefit, advantage or livelihood, whether for profit or not-for-profit in this state. (b) Includes the following: (i) any self-employed individual, sole proprietorship, domestic corporation, association, limited liability company, limited liability partnership, business trust, foreign corporation, foreign limited partnership or foreign limited liability company that is authorized to transact business in this state. (ii) Any business entity that possesses a business license, permit, certificate, approval, registration, charter or similar form of authorization issued by this state. (iii) Any business entity that is exempt by law from obtaining a business license. (iv) Any business entity operating unlawfully in this state without a required business authorization. 2. "Foreign jurisdiction" means any state, commonwealth, country, or nation outside this state. 3. "Medical intervention" means a medical procedure, treatment, device, drug, injection, medication or medical action taken to prevent or cure a disease or alter the health or biological function of a person. 4. "School": (a) Means any legal entity in this state that provides instruction to students in preschool programs, kindergarten programs, any of grades one through twelve, career and technical education programs, vocational programs or postsecondary education. (b) Includes any public school, private school, parochial school or postsecondary educational institution. (c) Does not include tribal colleges. 5. "Ticket issuer": (a) Means an individual or entity that provides tickets to an entertainment event. (b) Includes: (i) The operator of the venue where an entertainment event occurs. (ii) The sponsor or promoter of an entertainment event. (iii) A sports team that is participating in an entertainment event or a league whose teams are participating in an entertainment event. (iv) A theater company, musical group or similar entity that is participating in an entertainment event. (v) An agent of any individual or entity described in this paragraph. END_STATUTE Sec. 2. Short title This section may be cited as the "Arizona Medical Freedom Act".